Colorado statutes. TITLE 30 Government - County
PART 1
SOLID WASTES DISPOSAL SITES AND FACILITIES

Law reviews:

For article, "Solid Waste Disposal:

C

aught in the Act?", see 16

C

olo. Law. 1010 (1987).

30-20-100.5. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that:

Proper disposal of solid wastes is a matter of mixed statewide and local concern;

Improper disposal of solid wastes poses significant public health risks, environmental hazards, and long-term liability for the citizens of the state;

Colorado citizens are increasingly voicing their concerns about solid waste issues. Such concerns include the following:

How citizens can make maximum use of waste reduction and recycling programs as part of such citizens' personal environmental commitment;

Concerns of citizens relating to the siting of a solid wastes site and facility near their homes;

Challenges to public officials to react responsibly to assure safe and cost-effective solid waste management and disposal for their community over the next five to ten years.

Reflecting such concerns, private citizens and companies have joined with local and state officials to address the needs of Colorado concerning solid waste.

Optimal solid waste management in Colorado should include the following elements:

The state government, local governments, and private companies and citizens of Colorado each must play important roles in the management of solid waste in Colorado.

A statewide system of integrated solid waste management planning is necessary to meet Colorado's solid waste disposal needs over the next twenty years. Local governments and their citizens should be encouraged to work toward consensus concerning their solid waste disposal needs and concerning the types and numbers of solid wastes sites and facilities necessary or desirable in their areas.

State and local efforts in this area must be focused toward the reduction of the volume and toxicity of the waste stream. Realistic waste reduction goals should be established and state and local solid waste management goals should strive to achieve such goals through source reduction, recycling, composting, and similar waste management strategies.

Renewed efforts and new mechanisms are needed to ensure the full participation of the public in all phases of solid waste decision-making. All participants and concerned parties must contribute to a continuing, dedicated effort to inform and educate the public concerning solid waste and its impact on public health and the environment.

A strong component of statewide waste management efforts shall be the minimization of illegal disposal of solid wastes through the provision of the appropriate kinds and numbers of solid waste sites and facilities as needed to handle, treat, and dispose of solid waste in all areas of the state.

Source:

L. 91:

Entire section added, p. 963, § 1, effective June 5.

30-20-101. Definitions.

As used in this part 1, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Approved site or facility" means a site or facility for which a certificate of designation has been obtained, as provided in this part 1.

(1.5) "Closed site or facility" means a site or facility that has been closed in accordance with provisions of the federal regulations pursuant to subtitle D of the federal "Resource Conservation and Recovery Act of 1976", as amended, as published in 40 CFR 258.60, and in the manner specified in the approved certificate of designation application at the time of approval of the site or facility or in a closure plan that has been approved by the department.

"Department" means the department of public health and environment.

(2.3) "Excluded scrap metal" means processed scrap metal, unprocessed home scrap metal, and unprocessed prompt scrap metal.

(2.5) "Governing body having jurisdiction" means the board of county commissioners if a site and facility is located in any unincorporated portion of a county and means the governing body of the appropriate municipality if a site and facility is located within an incorporated area.

(2.6) "Home scrap metal" means scrap metal generated by steel mills, foundries, and refineries, including, but not limited to, turnings, cuttings, punchings, and borings.

(2.7) "Landfill gases" means gases formed by the decomposition of buried solid waste. Landfill gases include, but are not limited to, methane.

(2.8) "Municipality" means a home rule or statutory city, town, or city and county or a territorial charter city.

"Person" means an individual, partnership, private or municipal corporation, firm, board of a metropolitan district or sanitation district, or other association of persons.

(3.5) "Processed scrap metal" means scrap metal that has been manually or physically altered to separate it into distinct materials to enhance economic value or to improve the handling of materials. Processed scrap metal includes, but is not limited to:

Scrap metal that has been baled, shredded, sheared, chopped, crushed, flattened, cut, melted, or separated by metal type; and

Fines, drosses, and related materials that have been agglomerated.

(3.7) "Prompt scrap metal" means scrap metal generated by the metal working or fabrication industries, including, but not limited to, turnings, cuttings, punchings, and borings. "Prompt scrap metal" includes industrial metal scrap and new scrap metal.

"Recyclable materials" means any type of discarded or waste material that is not regulated under section 25-8-205 (1)(e), C.R.S., and can be reused, remanufactured, reclaimed, or recycled, but not including recycled auto parts or excluded scrap metal that is being recycled, or scrap that is composed of worn out metal or a metal product that has outlived its original use, commonly referred to as obsolete scrap.

"Recycling operation" means that part of a solid wastes disposal facility or a part of a general disposal facility at which recyclable materials may be separated from other materials for further processing.

(5.5) "Shredded circuit boards" means shredded electronic circuit boards that:

Are stored in containers that are sufficient to prevent any release to the environment prior to recovery; and

Do not contain mercury switches, mercury relays, nickel-cadmium batteries, or lithium batteries.

(5.8) "Solid and hazardous waste commission" means the solid and hazardous waste commission created in section 25-15-302, C.R.S.

"Solid waste" means any garbage, refuse, sludge from a waste treatment plant, water supply treatment plant, or air pollution control facility, and other discarded material, including solid, liquid, semisolid, or contained gaseous material resulting from industrial or commercial operations or from community activities.

"Solid waste" does not include:

Any solid or dissolved materials in domestic sewage;

Agricultural wastes;

Solid or dissolved materials in irrigation return flows;

Industrial discharges which are point sources subject to permits under the provisions of the "Colorado Water Quality Control Act", article 8 of title 25, C.R.S.;

Materials handled at facilities licensed pursuant to the provisions on radiation control in article 11 of title 25, C.R.S.;

Exploration and production wastes, as defined in section 34-60-103 (4.5), C.R.S., except as such wastes may be deposited at a commercial solid waste facility;

Excluded scrap metal that is being recycled; or

Shredded circuit boards that are being recycled.

"Solid wastes disposal" means the storage, treatment, utilization, processing, or final disposal of solid wastes.

"Solid wastes disposal site and facility" means the location and facility at which the deposit and final treatment of solid wastes occur.

(8.5) (Deleted by amendment, L. 2006, p. 1133, § 14, effective July 1, 2006.)

"Transfer station" means a facility at which refuse, awaiting transportation to a disposal site, is transferred from one type of containerized collection receptacle and placed into another or is processed for compaction.

"Water quality control commission" means the water quality control commission created in section 25-8-201, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 67:

p. 759, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-23-1.

L. 71:

p. 340, §§ 1, 2.

L. 83:

(6) R&RE, p. 1239, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(2.5) and (2.7) added, p. 964, § 2, effective June 5.

L. 92:

(1.5) added and (7) and (9) amended, p. 1275, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(8.5) added, p. 32, § 1, effective March 9; (2) amended, p. 2800, § 557, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(6) amended, p. 120, § 2, effective March 31.

L. 98:

(2.3), (2.6), (3.5), (3.7), (5.5), (6)(b)(VII), and (6)(b)(VIII) added and (6)(b)(V) amended, pp. 171, 172, §§ 2, 3, effective April 6; (3) amended, p. 1071, § 4, effective June 1; (4) amended, p. 880, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2001:

(2.7) amended and (2.8) added, p. 1100, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(8.5) amended and (5.8) and (10) added, p. 1133, § 14, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Subsection (5.8) was originally numbered as (5.5) in Senate Bill 06-171 but has been renumbered on revision for ease of location.

Cross references:

(1) For definitions applicable to this part 1, see § 30-26-301 (2)(d).

(2) For the legislative declaration contained in the 1995 act amending subsection (6), see section 1 of chapter 42, Session Laws of Colorado 1995. For the legislative declaration contained in the 1998 act enacting subsections (2.3), (2.6), (3.5), (3.7), (5.5), (6)(b)(VII), and (6)(b)(VIII) and amending subsection (6)(b)(V), see section 1 of chapter 68, Session Laws of Colorado 1998. For the legislative declaration contained in the 1998 act amending subsection (4), see section 1 of chapter 236, Session Laws of Colorado 1998.

30-20-101.5. Additional powers of the department - legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that a solid waste management program shall be created in and administered by the department and shall be implemented to protect human health and the environment in a manner that:

Promotes a community ethic to reduce or eliminate waste problems;

Is credible and accountable to the industry and the public;

Is innovative and cost effective; and

Protects the environmental quality of life for affected residents as required by the requirements of this part 1 and any rules promulgated in connection therewith.

The department shall develop, implement, and continuously improve as necessary policies and procedures for carrying out its statutory responsibilities at the lowest possible cost while satisfying the legislative intent expressed in subsection (1) of this section. At a minimum, the policies and procedures shall, to the extent practicable, include the establishment of the following:

Cost-effective level-of-effort guidelines for reviewing submittals, including without limitation permit applications and design and operation plans to assure conformity with regulatory requirements, taking into consideration the degree of risk addressed and the complexity of the issues raised;

Cost-effective level-of-effort guidelines for performing inspections that focus on major violations of regulatory requirements that pose an immediate and significant threat to human health and the environment;

Cost-effective level-of-effort guidelines for enforcement activity;

Schedules for the timely completion of department activities including without limitation submittal reviews, inspections, and inspection reports;

A prioritization methodology for completing activities that focuses on actual risk to human health and the environment;

A preference for compliance assistance with at least ten percent of the annual budget amount of the program being allocated to compliance assistance efforts;

A preference for alternative dispute resolution mechanisms to timely resolve disputed issues; and

A mechanism that continuously assesses and provides incentives for further improvements and policies and procedures of the department.

Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), on or before February 1, 2008, and not later than February 1 of each year thereafter, the department shall submit a report to the standing committee of reference in each house of the general assembly exercising jurisdiction over matters concerning public health and the environment that describes the status of the solid waste management program, the department's efforts to satisfy its statutory responsibilities at the lowest possible cost while meeting the legislative intent specified in subsection (1) of this section, and the department's implementation of the authority to accept environmental covenants created pursuant to section 25-15-321.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire section added, p. 1142, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 2017:

(3) amended, (SB 17-056), ch. 33, p. 96, § 14, effective March 16.

Cross references:

For the short title "Recycling Resources Economic Opportunity Act" and legislative declaration contained in the 2007 act enacting this section, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 278, Session Laws of Colorado 2007.

30-20-102. Unlawful to operate site and facility without certificate of designation - rules - exceptions.

Except as otherwise specified in this section, a person who owns or operates a solid wastes disposal site and facility shall first obtain a certificate of designation from the governing body having jurisdiction over the area in which such site and facility is located.

Except as otherwise specified in this section, solid wastes disposal by any person is prohibited except on or at a solid wastes disposal site and facility for which a certificate of designation has been obtained as provided in section 30-20-105.

A person other than a governmental unit may dispose of the person's own solid wastes on the person's own property, as long as such solid wastes disposal site and facility complies with the rules of the solid and hazardous waste commission and does not constitute a public nuisance. For the purposes of this part 1, such solid wastes disposal site and facility shall be an approved site for which obtaining a certificate of designation under section 30-20-105 is unnecessary. This subsection (3) does not preclude any person from applying for a certificate of designation for the disposal of the person's own solid wastes on the person's own property.

A person who is engaged in mining operations pursuant to a permit issued by the mined land reclamation board or office of mined land reclamation that contains an approved plan of reclamation may dispose of solid wastes generated by such operations within the permitted area for such operations. For the purposes of this part 1, such solid wastes disposal site and facility is an approved site for which obtaining a certificate of designation under section 30-20-105 is unnecessary.

Any site and facility operated for the purpose of processing, reclaiming, or recycling recyclable materials shall not be considered a solid wastes disposal site and facility and shall not require a certificate of designation as a solid wastes disposal site and facility; except that, after an initial accumulation period specified by rule, such a site or facility shall maintain documentation that proves recyclable materials are being recycled at the site at a rate that approximately equals the rate at which recyclable materials are being collected. The solid and hazardous waste commission shall promulgate rules to specify what time periods and volumes of recyclable materials constitute operations that qualify for this exemption and to define what materials shall be deemed to be recyclable materials for the purposes of this subsection (5); except that such rules shall not define the term "recyclable materials" to include materials that are likely to contaminate groundwater or create off-site odors as a result of processing, reclaiming, recycling, or storage prior to recycling. This subsection (5) does not apply to activities regulated under section 25-8-205 (1)(e), C.R.S.

The final use for beneficial purposes, including fertilizer, soil conditioner, fuel, and livestock feed, of biosolids that have been processed and certified or designated as meeting all applicable rules of the solid and hazardous waste commission and the department of agriculture does not require a certificate of designation for such final use. In addition, the use of manure as a fertilizer or soil conditioner or the composting on the site of generation of manure with other compatible materials necessary for effective composting as part of a standard agricultural practice does not require a certificate of designation.

A transfer station shall not be deemed to be a solid wastes disposal site and facility and shall not require a certificate of designation as a solid wastes disposal site and facility. The department shall promulgate regulations establishing health and safety standards for the operation of transfer stations.

(7.5) (a) On or after August 8, 2012, a governing body having jurisdiction shall not require a certificate of designation for waste impoundments or other solid wastes disposal operations of drinking water treatment residuals generated on-site at a drinking water treatment facility. A certificate of designation for waste impoundments or other solid wastes disposal operations of drinking water treatment residuals generated on-site at a drinking water treatment facility issued before August 8, 2012, is voidable at the option of the facility.

A drinking water treatment facility that does not require a certificate of designation pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (7.5) shall comply with the rules of the solid and hazardous waste commission for waste impoundments and solid wastes disposal.

Nothing in paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection (7.5) limits the application of other local government land use regulations to waste impoundments or solid wastes disposal operations at a drinking water treatment facility.

The solid and hazardous waste commission, by rule, may specify types of composting facilities, by size, volume, or other suitable criteria that provide equivalent protection of public health and the environment that would not be required to obtain a certificate of designation.

Source:

L. 67:

p. 759, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-23-2.

L. 71:

p. 341, § 3.

L. 76:

(3) added, p. 694, § 1, effective April 19.

L. 77:

(1) amended, p. 286, §§ 56, 57, effective July 1.

L. 79:

(1.5) added, p. 1148, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 1358, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 83:

(2) amended, p. 1239, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 89:

(5) amended, p. 1282, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 965, § 3, effective June 5.

L. 92:

(1) amended, p. 2177, § 37, effective June 2; (4) amended, p. 1971, § 77, effective July 1; (5) amended and (7) added, p. 1275, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(3) and (6) amended, p. 32, § 2, effective March 9.

L. 98:

(5) and (6) amended and (8) added, p. 881, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(3), (5), (6), and (8) amended, p. 1133, § 15, effective July 1.

L. 2012:

(1), (2), (3), (4), and (6) amended and (7.5) added, (HB 12-1078), ch. 48, p. 177, § 1, effective August 8.

30-20-102.5. Requirement for certificate of designation deemed satisfied - when.

A certificate of designation for a hazardous waste disposal site issued pursuant to article 15 of title 25, C.R.S., shall be deemed to satisfy any requirement for a certificate of designation imposed by this part 1.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire section added, p. 1359, § 3, effective July 1.

30-20-103. Application for certificate.

Any person desiring to own or operate a solid wastes disposal site and facility shall make application to the governing body having jurisdiction over the area in which such site and facility is or is proposed to be located for a certificate of designation. Such application shall be accompanied by a fee to be established by the governing body having jurisdiction, which fee shall be based on the anticipated costs that may be incurred by such governing board in the application review and approval process and shall not be refundable. The application shall set forth the location of the site and facility; the type of site and facility; the type of processing to be used, such as sanitary landfill, composting, or incineration; the hours of operation; the method of supervision; the rates to be charged, if any; and such other information as may be required by the governing body having jurisdiction over the area. The application shall also contain such engineering, geological, hydrological, and operational data as may be required by the department by rule. All such applications shall be referred to the department for review and for recommendation as to approval or disapproval, which shall be based upon criteria established by the solid and hazardous waste commission, the water quality control commission, and the air quality control commission. Such review and recommendation of an application by the department shall include a technical review of the environmental and public health issues provided in section 30-20-110 that are raised by the proposed site and facility. As a part of the department's review of an application for a solid wastes site and facility, the department shall provide a period of not less than thirty days during which members of the public may review and make comments concerning such application.

Upon receiving an application for a solid wastes disposal site and facility, the department shall perform an initial examination to establish the completeness of the information submitted. Such initial examination shall be completed within thirty days after the department receives such application. The department shall mail written notification to the applicant within such time period of the department's decision either to begin its review of such application or to reject such application because of incompleteness.

After the initial approval of an application pursuant to the provisions of subsection (2) of this section, the department shall determine whether it shall complete the review of the application or whether it shall offer the applicant the option of having such application reviewed by a private contractor. Such determination shall be made pursuant to the provisions of section 30-20-103.7 (1). If the department reviews such application, the department shall complete such review within one hundred fifty days after the date of issuance of its initial approval of such application.

Source:

L. 67:

p. 759, § 3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-23-3.

L. 71:

p. 341, § 4.

L. 79:

Entire section amended, p. 1059, § 7, effective June 20.

L. 84:

Entire section amended, p. 819, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 965, § 4, effective June 5; entire section amended, p. 955, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(1) amended, p. 1134, § 16, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Amendments to this section by Senate Bill 91-168 and Senate Bill 91-174 were harmonized.

30-20-103.5. Existing solid wastes disposal sites and facilities - application procedures.

Except as specified in section 30-20-109 (1.5), no existing solid wastes disposal site and facility that is operating pursuant to a valid certificate of designation shall be deemed to be in violation of any provision of this part 1 because of any failure to comply with application procedures that are enacted after the issuance of such certificate of designation.

Source:

L. 91:

Entire section added, p. 966, § 5, effective June 5.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 2170, § 3, effective June 4.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2008 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 421, Session Laws of Colorado 2008.

30-20-103.7. Review of applications by private contractors.

Upon issuing an initial approval of an application for a solid wastes disposal site and facility under the provisions of section 30-20-103 (2), the department shall determine whether it will be able to complete review of such application within one hundred fifty days. If the department determines that it is capable of completing the review within the required time period, it shall commence review under the provisions of section 30-20-103. If the department determines that it cannot complete the review of an application within such time period, the department shall offer the applicant the option of having such application reviewed by a private contractor within one hundred fifty days or having such application reviewed by the department. If the applicant chooses to have such application reviewed by the department, the department shall not be required to complete its review within the one-hundred-fifty-day time period.

A county shall not reject an application for a solid wastes disposal site and facility solely because the review of such application was performed by a private contractor under the provisions of this section.

The department shall maintain a register of private contractors to review applications for solid wastes disposal sites and facilities. The department is hereby authorized to contract with such private contractors pursuant to the provisions of part 14 of article 30 of title 24, C.R.S., for inclusion on such register. Any such contract shall be between the department and the private contractor. An applicant shall be responsible for the fee charged by a private contractor for the review of such applicant's application, but shall not be a party to such contract. The department shall contract with a sufficient number of private contractors to allow reassignment of an application if it is necessary to disqualify one or more private contractors because of conflicts of interest or other reasons.

If the department assigns an application to a private contractor under the provisions of this section, such private contractor shall provide the department and the applicant with the fee schedule of such private contractor and with an estimate of the fee to be charged for the review of such application.

Upon being notified of the identity of the assigned private contractor and upon receiving such private contractor's fee schedule and estimated fee, an applicant has the option to allow the application review to commence or to reject the private contractor. If such applicant rejects a private contractor, the department shall assign a second private contractor. If such applicant rejects the second private contractor, the department shall review such applicant's application, but the department shall not be required to complete such review within the one-hundred-fifty-day time period.

The review of an application for a solid wastes disposal site and facility by a private contractor shall be based upon the same criteria as is used by the department of public health and environment under the provisions of section 30-20-103.

During the review period for an application, a private contractor shall contact the applicant and the department concerning any problems such private contractor finds in such application and shall offer the applicant an opportunity to provide such materials or explanations as the private contractor determines are necessary to complete review of such application or to make necessary amendments to such application.

Any moneys which are collected by the department from solid wastes disposal site and facility applicants in payment for private contractor application review fees shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the solid waste management fund created in section 30-20-118. Such moneys collected for the fees charged by private contractors shall be annually appropriated by the general assembly to the department for the sole purpose of transferring such fees to such private contractors in payment for their services.

Source:

L. 91:

Entire section added, p. 956, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(2)(d) amended, p. 2800, § 558, effective March 9.

30-20-104. Factors to be considered.

In considering an application for a proposed solid wastes disposal site and facility, the governing body having jurisdiction shall take into account:

The effect that the solid wastes disposal site and facility will have on the surrounding property, taking into consideration the types of processing to be used, surrounding property uses and values, and wind and climatic conditions;

The convenience and accessibility of the solid wastes disposal site and facility to potential users;

The ability of the applicant to comply with the health standards and operating procedures provided for in this part 1 and such rules and regulations as may be prescribed by the department;

Recommendations by county, district, or municipal public health agencies.

Except as provided in this part 1, designation of approved solid wastes disposal sites and facilities shall be discretionary with the governing body having jurisdiction, subject to judicial review by the district court of appropriate jurisdiction.

Prior to the issuance of a certificate of designation, the governing body having jurisdiction shall require that the report, which shall be submitted by the applicant under section 30-20-103, be reviewed and a recommendation as to approval or disapproval be made by the department and shall be satisfied that the proposed solid wastes disposal site and facility conforms to the local government's comprehensive land use plan and zoning restrictions, if any. Any technical conditions of approval made by the department in its final report shall be incorporated as requirements in the certificate of designation. The application, report of the department, comprehensive land use plan, relevant zoning ordinances, and other pertinent information shall be presented to the governing body having jurisdiction at a public hearing to be held after notice. Such notice shall contain the time and place of the hearing, shall state that the matter to be considered is the applicant's proposal for a solid wastes disposal site and facility, shall provide a description of such proposed site and facility, and shall provide a description of the geographic area that is within three miles of such proposed site and facility. The notice shall be published in a newspaper having general circulation in the county or municipality in which the proposed solid wastes disposal site and facility is located at least ten but no more than thirty days prior to the date of the hearing. In addition, the notice of such public hearing shall be posted at a conspicuous point in at least one location at the offices of the governing body having jurisdiction and in at least one location at the proposed site. Such notice shall be posted for a period beginning at least thirty days before the public hearing and continuing through the date of such hearing.

At the public hearing held pursuant to the provisions of this subsection (3), the governing body shall hear any written or oral testimony presented by governmental entities and residents concerning such proposed site or facility. All such testimony shall be considered by the governing body having jurisdiction in making a decision concerning such application. For the purposes of this subsection (3), "residents" means all individuals who reside within the geographic area controlled by the governing body having jurisdiction or within three miles of the proposed site and facility or who own property which lies within three miles of such proposed site and facility without regard to which county or municipality such individuals reside within.

Source:

L. 67:

p. 760, § 4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-23-4.

L. 71:

p. 341, § 5.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 966, § 6, effective June 5.

L. 98:

(3)(a) amended, p. 881, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

(1)(d) amended, (HB 10-1422), ch. 419, p. 2119, § 164, effective August 11.

30-20-104.5. Closure and postclosure care estimates - corrective action cost estimates - financial assurance requirements - rules.

The solid and hazardous waste commission shall promulgate rules that implement financial assurance requirements for the final closure of solid wastes disposal sites and facilities, the conduct of postclosure care for such sites and facilities, and the undertaking of any corrective action made necessary by the migration of contaminants from such sites and facilities into groundwater. Such rules shall include, but are not limited to, the following requirements:

That the owner or operator of any solid wastes disposal site and facility shall maintain:

A detailed written estimate of the cost of hiring a third party to close the largest area of such site and facility which has or will require a cover during the active life of such site and facility; and

A detailed written estimate of the cost of hiring a third party to conduct postclosure care at such site and facility;

That the owner or operator of any solid wastes disposal site and facility that is required to undertake a corrective action program pursuant to the requirements of subpart E of the federal regulations promulgated pursuant to the provisions of subtitle D of the federal "Resource Conservation and Recovery Act of 1976", as amended, shall maintain a detailed written estimate of the cost of hiring a third party to perform such corrective action;

That the owner or operator of any solid wastes disposal site and facility shall notify the department when the cost estimates required by paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection (1) have been placed in the operating file for such site and facility;

That the owner or operator of any solid wastes disposal site and facility shall:

Express the cost estimates required by paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection (1) in current dollars;

Annually adjust such cost estimates to account for inflation; and

Increase such cost estimates under the following circumstances:

The cost estimate for the cost of hiring a third party to close such site and facility maintained pursuant to the provisions of subparagraph (I) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) shall be increased if changes to the closure plan for such site and facility or changes in the conditions of such site and facility increase the maximum cost of closure at any time during the remaining active life of such site and facility.

The cost estimate for the cost of hiring a third party to conduct postclosure care for such site and facility maintained pursuant to the provisions of subparagraph (II) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) shall be increased if changes to the postclosure plan for such site and facility or changes in the conditions of site and facility increase the maximum cost of postclosure care for such site and facility.

The cost estimate, if any, for the cost of hiring a third party to undertake corrective action for such site and facility maintained pursuant to the provisions of paragraph (b) of this subsection (1) shall be increased if changes in the corrective action program for such site and facility or changes in the conditions of such site and facility increase the maximum cost of corrective action for such site and facility.

That the owner or operator of any solid wastes disposal site and facility shall comply with the financial assurance requirements mandated by the rules of the solid and hazardous waste commission promulgated pursuant to subsection (3) of this section.

The owner or operator of a solid wastes disposal site and facility may reduce the amount of a cost estimate maintained pursuant to the provisions of paragraph (a) or (b) of subsection (1) of this section if such cost estimate exceeds the maximum cost of completing the actions contemplated by such cost estimate.

The solid and hazardous waste commission shall promulgate rules that require the owner or operator of a solid wastes disposal site and facility to establish sufficient financial assurance to pay for the cost estimates required by paragraphs (a) and (b) of subsection (1) of this section. No solid wastes disposal site and facility shall operate without being in compliance with the financial assurance requirements contained in such rules. Such rules shall include, but shall not be limited to, provisions that define the mechanisms that may be used by the owner or operator of a solid wastes disposal site and facility to establish sufficient financial assurance pursuant to this section. The mechanisms to establish financial assurance that are defined by the commission shall include, but are not limited to, those mechanisms authorized by the federal regulations promulgated pursuant to subtitle D of the federal "Resource Conservation and Recovery Act of 1976", as amended.

The sufficiency of the financial assurance provided pursuant to the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection (3) for any proposed solid wastes disposal site and facility shall be reviewed as part of the department's review of the application for such proposed site and facility pursuant to the provisions of this section.

The sufficiency of the financial assurance provided pursuant to the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection (3) for any solid wastes disposal site and facility that is in existence at the time the applicable regulations of the department become effective shall be reviewed pursuant to the procedures established by the department. Such review may be performed either by the department or by a private contractor hired by the department for the purpose of completing such review. The department is authorized to impose a fee for any such review that is performed by the department; except that such fee shall not exceed the actual documented costs incurred by the department in the performance of such review. Except as otherwise provided in this section, any such review that is performed by a private contractor shall be conducted pursuant to the provisions of section 30-20-103.7.

(3.5) The department, pursuant to the provisions of part 14 of article 30 of title 24, C.R.S., is authorized to contract with one or more private contractors for the purpose of conducting the third-party closure, postclosure care, or corrective action at a solid waste facility as may be necessary. The department is authorized to expend such moneys for closure, postclosure care, or corrective action as is made available to the department by operation of law from the financial assurance mechanisms provided by the owner or operator of the solid wastes site and facility. Any such contract shall be between the department and the private contractor. The owner or operator shall not be a party to such contract. The department may disallow a contractor because of conflicts of interest or other reasons. The department may contract with the governing body that issued the certificate of designation to conduct such closure, postclosure care, or corrective action.

The rules promulgated by the solid and hazardous waste commission pursuant to this section shall comply with the federal regulations promulgated pursuant to subtitle D of the federal "Resource Conservation and Recovery Act of 1976", as amended. Such rules shall require that all solid wastes disposal sites and facilities be fully in compliance with such rules by the date established in the federal "Resource Conservation and Recovery Act of 1976", as amended, and its regulations.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire section added, p. 1276, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(4) amended, p. 33, § 3, effective March 9.

L. 98:

(3.5) added, p. 882, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

IP(1), (1)(e), (3)(a), and (4) amended, p. 1135, § 17, effective July 1.